Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3010
Violations; prosecution; limitation.

Prosecutions for any violations of the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act shall be brought by the Attorney General or county attorney in the county in which the violation occurs. Any prosecution for the violation of any of the provisions of the act shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense.

Laws 1969, c. 635, § 10, p. 2545;

Laws 2019, LB538, § 8.